Arkansas, session 2025, HB1072.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 26-3-306(b), concerning establishing
eligibility for a property tax exemption for disabled veterans, surviving
spouses, and minor dependent children using documentation provided by the
Department of Veterans Affairs, is amended to add an additional subdivision
to read as follows:
(3)(A) A letter from the department required under this
subsection is required to be submitted only one (1) time to establish
eligibility for the exemption provided under this section.
(B) Annual submission of a letter from the department is
not required.
*JLL083*
04-03-2025 09:25:32 JLL083

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 S4/3/25 HB1072
(C) A taxpayer who has previously submitted a letter under
this subsection shall notify the county collector if:
(i) There has been a legal change in the status of
the taxpayer and the taxpayer no longer qualifies for the exemption provided
under this section; or
(ii) There is a change in the property description,
ownership, use, or occupancy of the property for which the taxpayer claimed
an exemption under this section in the immediately preceding assessment year.
(D) A taxpayer claiming an exemption under this section
who changes his or her homestead shall submit a new letter under this section
to the county collector of the county in which the new homestead is located.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 26-3-306, concerning the property tax
exemption for disabled veterans, surviving spouses, and minor dependent
children, is amended to add an additional subsection to read as follows:
(g) If a county collector determines that an exemption under this
section was granted erroneously, the county collector:
(1) Shall remove the exemption from the property; and
(2) May levy up to three (3) years of the property taxes that
should have been paid on the property plus any applicable penalties,
interest, and costs and collect the taxes, penalties, interest, and costs
from the taxpayer who claimed the erroneous exemption.

SECTION 3. EFFECTIVE DATE. Sections 1 and 2 of this act are effective
for assessment years beginning on or after January 1, 2025.

/s/C. Cooper









04-03-2025 09:25:32 JLL083